src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/uk/hyphenation/hyph_uk.dic
-н8ю8
8н8ю8-7
н2ю1
-н8я8
8н8я8-7
н2я1
-2н8'8
-2н8’8
8н8'8-7
8н8’8-7
-о8а8
-2о1
8о8а8-7
-о8б8
8о8б8-7
-о8в8
8о8в8-7
-о8г8
8о8г8-7
-о8ґ8
8о8ґ8-7
-о8д8
8о8д8-7
-о8е8
8о8е8-7
-о8є8
8о8є8-7
-о8ж8
8о8ж8-7
-о8з8
8о8з8-7
-о8и8
8о8и8-7
о2и1
-о8і8
8о8і8-7
-о8ї8
8о8ї8-7
-о8й8
8о8й8-7
-о8к8
8о8к8-7
-о8л8
8о8л8-7
-о8м8
8о8м8-7
-о8н8
8о8н8-7
-2о8о8
8о8о8-7
-о8п8
8о8п8-7
-о8р8
8о8р8-7
-о8с8
8о8с8-7
-о8т8
8о8т8-7
-о8у8
8о8у8-7
-о8ф8
8о8ф8-7
-о8х8
8о8х8-7
-о8ц8
8о8ц8-7
-о8ч8
8о8ч8-7
-о8ш8
8о8ш8-7
-о8щ8
8о8щ8-7
-о8ь8
8о8ь8-7
о6ь
-о8ю8
8о8ю8-7
-о8я8
8о8я8-7
-о8'8
-о8’8
8о8'8-7
о6'
8о8’8-7
о6’
-п8а8
8п8а8-7
-2п8б8
8п8б8-7
-п8в8
8п8в8-7
-п8г8
8п8г8-7
-п8ґ8
8п8ґ8-7
-2п8д8
8п8д8-7
-п8е8
8п8е8-7
-п8є8
8п8є8-7
п2є1
-п8ж8
8п8ж8-7
-2п8з8
8п8з8-7
-п8и8
8п8и8-7
п2и1
-п8і8
8п8і8-7
-п8ї8
8п8ї8-7
п2ї1
-п8й8
8п8й8-7
-п8к8
8п8к8-7
-п8л8
8п8л8-7
-п8м8
8п8м8-7
-п8н8
8п8н8-7
-п8о8
8п8о8-7
-2п8п8
8п8п8-7
-п8р8
8п8р8-7
-п8с8
8п8с8-7
-п8т8
8п8т8-7
-п8у8
8п8у8-7
п2у1
-п8ф8
8п8ф8-7
-п8х8
8п8х8-7
-п8ц8
8п8ц8-7
-п8ч8
8п8ч8-7
-п8ш8
8п8ш8-7
-п8щ8
8п8щ8-7
-п8ь8
8п8ь8-7
п6ь
-п8ю8
8п8ю8-7
п2ю1
-п8я8
8п8я8-7
п2я1
-п8'8
-п8’8
8п8'8-7
п6'
8п8’8-7
п6’
-р8а8
8р8а8-7
-2р8б8
8р8б8-7
-2р8в8
8р8в8-7
-2р8г8
8р8г8-7
-2р8ґ8
8р8ґ8-7
-2р8д8
8р8д8-7
-р8е8
8р8е8-7
-р8є8
8р8є8-7
р2є1
-2р8ж8
8р8ж8-7
-2р8з8
8р8з8-7
-р8и8
8р8и8-7
р2и1
-р8і8
8р8і8-7
р2і1
-р8ї8
8р8ї8-7
р2ї1
-2р8й8
8р8й8-7
-2р8к8
8р8к8-7
-2р8л8
8р8л8-7
-2р8м8
8р8м8-7
-2р8н8
8р8н8-7
-р8о8
8р8о8-7
-2р8п8
8р8п8-7
-2р8р8
8р8р8-7
-2р8с8
8р8с8-7
-2р8т8
8р8т8-7
-р8у8
8р8у8-7
-2р8ф8
8р8ф8-7
-2р8х8
8р8х8-7
-2р8ц8
8р8ц8-7
-2р8ч8
8р8ч8-7
-2р8ш8
8р8ш8-7
-2р8щ8
8р8щ8-7
-р8ь8
8р8ь8-7
-р8ю8
8р8ю8-7
р2ю1
-р8я8
8р8я8-7
р2я1
-2р8'8
-2р8’8
8р8'8-7
8р8’8-7
-с8а8
8с8а8-7
-2с8б8
8с8б8-7
-с8в8
8с8в8-7
-2с8г8
8с8г8-7
-с8ґ8
8с8ґ8-7
-2с8д8
8с8д8-7
-с8е8
8с8е8-7
-с8є8
8с8є8-7
с2є1
-с8ж8
8с8ж8-7
-с8з8
8с8з8-7
-с8и8
8с8и8-7
с2и1
-с8і8
8с8і8-7
с2і1
-с8ї8
8с8ї8-7
с2ї1
-с8й8
8с8й8-7
-с8к8
8с8к8-7
-с8л8
8с8л8-7
-с8м8
8с8м8-7
-с8н8
8с8н8-7
-с8о8
8с8о8-7
-с8п8
8с8п8-7
-с8р8
8с8р8-7
-2с8с8
8с8с8-7
-с8т8
8с8т8-7
-с8у8
8с8у8-7
-с8ф8
8с8ф8-7
-с8х8
8с8х8-7
-с8ц8
8с8ц8-7
-с8ч8
8с8ч8-7
-с8ш8
8с8ш8-7
-с8щ8
8с8щ8-7
-с8ь8
8с8ь8-7
-с8ю8
8с8ю8-7
с2ю1
-с8я8
8с8я8-7
с2я1
-с8'8
-с8’8
8с8'8-7
с6'
8с8’8-7
с6’
-т8а8
8т8а8-7
т2а1
-2т8б8
8т8б8-7
-т8в8
8т8в8-7
-2т8г8
8т8г8-7
-т8ґ8
8т8ґ8-7
-2т8д8
8т8д8-7
-т8е8
8т8е8-7
-т8є8
8т8є8-7
т2є1
-2т8ж8
8т8ж8-7
-2т8з8
8т8з8-7
-т8и8
8т8и8-7
т2и1
-т8і8
8т8і8-7
т2і1
-т8ї8
8т8ї8-7
т2ї1
-т8й8
8т8й8-7
-т8к8
8т8к8-7
-т8л8
8т8л8-7
-т8м8
8т8м8-7
-т8н8
8т8н8-7
-т8о8
8т8о8-7
-т8п8
8т8п8-7
-т8р8
8т8р8-7
-т8с8
8т8с8-7
-2т8т8
8т8т8-7
-т8у8
8т8у8-7
-т8ф8
8т8ф8-7
-т8х8
8т8х8-7
-т8ц8
8т8ц8-7
-т8ч8
8т8ч8-7
-т8ш8
8т8ш8-7
-т8щ8
8т8щ8-7
-т8ь8
8т8ь8-7
-т8ю8
8т8ю8-7
т2ю1
-т8я8
8т8я8-7
т2я1
-т8'8
-т8’8
8т8'8-7
т6'
8т8’8-7
т6’
-у8а8
-2у1
8у8а8-7
-у8б8
8у8б8-7
-у8в8
8у8в8-7
-у8г8
8у8г8-7
-у8ґ8
8у8ґ8-7
-у8д8
8у8д8-7
-у8е8
8у8е8-7
-у8є8
8у8є8-7
-у8ж8
8у8ж8-7
-у8з8
8у8з8-7
-у8и8
8у8и8-7
у2и1
-у8і8
8у8і8-7
-у8ї8
8у8ї8-7
-у8й8
8у8й8-7
-у8к8
8у8к8-7
-у8л8
8у8л8-7
-у8м8
8у8м8-7
-у8н8
8у8н8-7
-у8о8
8у8о8-7
-у8п8
8у8п8-7
-у8р8
8у8р8-7
-у8с8
8у8с8-7
-у8т8
8у8т8-7
-2у8у8
8у8у8-7
-у8ф8
8у8ф8-7
-у8х8
8у8х8-7
-у8ц8
8у8ц8-7
-у8ч8
8у8ч8-7
-у8ш8
8у8ш8-7
-у8щ8
8у8щ8-7
-у8ь8
8у8ь8-7
у6ь
-у8ю8
8у8ю8-7
-у8я8
8у8я8-7
-у8'8
-у8’8
8у8'8-7
у6'
8у8’8-7
у6’
-ф8а8
8ф8а8-7
ф2а1
-2ф8б8
8ф8б8-7
-ф8в8
8ф8в8-7
-2ф8г8
8ф8г8-7
-ф8ґ8
8ф8ґ8-7
-ф8д8
8ф8д8-7
-ф8е8
8ф8е8-7
ф2е1
-ф8є8
8ф8є8-7
ф2є1
-ф8ж8
8ф8ж8-7
-2ф8з8
8ф8з8-7
-ф8и8
8ф8и8-7
ф2и1
-ф8і8
8ф8і8-7
-ф8ї8
8ф8ї8-7
ф2ї1
-ф8й8
8ф8й8-7
-ф8к8
8ф8к8-7
-ф8л8
8ф8л8-7
-ф8м8
8ф8м8-7
-ф8н8
8ф8н8-7
-ф8о8
8ф8о8-7
-ф8п8
8ф8п8-7
-ф8р8
8ф8р8-7
-ф8с8
8ф8с8-7
-ф8т8
8ф8т8-7
-ф8у8
8ф8у8-7
ф2у1
-2ф8ф8
8ф8ф8-7
-ф8х8
8ф8х8-7
-ф8ц8
8ф8ц8-7
-ф8ч8
8ф8ч8-7
-ф8ш8
8ф8ш8-7
-ф8щ8
8ф8щ8-7
-ф8ь8
8ф8ь8-7
-ф8ю8
8ф8ю8-7
ф2ю1
-ф8я8
8ф8я8-7
ф2я1
-ф8'8
-ф8’8
8ф8'8-7
ф6'
8ф8’8-7
ф6’
-х8а8
8х8а8-7
х2а1
-х8б8
8х8б8-7
-х8в8
8х8в8-7
-2х8г8
8х8г8-7
-х8ґ8
8х8ґ8-7
-2х8д8
8х8д8-7
-х8е8
8х8е8-7
х2е1
-х8є8
8х8є8-7
х2є1
-х8ж8
8х8ж8-7
-х8з8
8х8з8-7
-х8и8
8х8и8-7
х2и1
-х8і8
8х8і8-7
-х8ї8
8х8ї8-7
х2ї1
-х8й8
8х8й8-7
-х8к8
8х8к8-7
-х8л8
8х8л8-7
-х8м8
8х8м8-7
-х8н8
8х8н8-7
-х8о8
8х8о8-7
-х8п8
8х8п8-7
-х8р8
8х8р8-7
-х8с8
8х8с8-7
-х8т8
8х8т8-7
-х8у8
8х8у8-7
х2у1
-х8ф8
8х8ф8-7
-2х8х8
8х8х8-7
-х8ц8
8х8ц8-7
-х8ч8
8х8ч8-7
-х8ш8
8х8ш8-7
-х8щ8
8х8щ8-7
-х8ь8
8х8ь8-7
х6ь
-х8ю8
8х8ю8-7
х2ю1
-х8я8
8х8я8-7
х2я1
-х8'8
-х8’8
8х8'8-7
х6'
8х8’8-7
х6’
-ц8а8
8ц8а8-7
-2ц8б8
8ц8б8-7
-ц8в8
8ц8в8-7
-2ц8г8
8ц8г8-7
-ц8ґ8
8ц8ґ8-7
-2ц8д8
8ц8д8-7
-ц8е8
8ц8е8-7
-ц8є8
8ц8є8-7
ц2є1
-ц8ж8
8ц8ж8-7
-2ц8з8
8ц8з8-7
-ц8и8
8ц8и8-7
ц2и1
-ц8і8
8ц8і8-7
ц2і1
-ц8ї8
8ц8ї8-7
ц2ї1
-ц8й8
8ц8й8-7
-ц8к8
8ц8к8-7
-ц8л8
8ц8л8-7
-ц8м8
8ц8м8-7
-ц8н8
8ц8н8-7
-ц8о8
8ц8о8-7
ц2о1
-ц8п8
8ц8п8-7
-ц8р8
8ц8р8-7
-ц8с8
8ц8с8-7
-ц8т8
8ц8т8-7
-ц8у8
8ц8у8-7
-ц8ф8
8ц8ф8-7
-ц8х8
8ц8х8-7
-2ц8ц8
8ц8ц8-7
-ц8ч8
8ц8ч8-7
-ц8ш8
8ц8ш8-7
-ц8щ8
8ц8щ8-7
-ц8ь8
8ц8ь8-7
-ц8ю8
8ц8ю8-7
ц2ю1
-ц8я8
8ц8я8-7
ц2я1
-ц8'8
-ц8’8
8ц8'8-7
ц6'
8ц8’8-7
ц6’
-ч8а8
8ч8а8-7
ч2а1
-2ч8б8
8ч8б8-7
-ч8в8
8ч8в8-7
-ч8г8
8ч8г8-7
-ч8ґ8
8ч8ґ8-7
-2ч8д8
8ч8д8-7
-ч8е8
8ч8е8-7
ч2е1
-ч8є8
8ч8є8-7
ч2є1
-2ч8ж8
8ч8ж8-7
-ч8з8
8ч8з8-7
-ч8и8
8ч8и8-7
ч2и1
-ч8і8
8ч8і8-7
ч2і1
-ч8ї8
8ч8ї8-7
ч2ї1
-ч8й8
8ч8й8-7
-ч8к8
8ч8к8-7
-ч8л8
8ч8л8-7
-ч8м8
8ч8м8-7
-ч8н8
8ч8н8-7
-ч8о8
8ч8о8-7
-ч8п8
8ч8п8-7
-ч8р8
8ч8р8-7
-ч8с8
8ч8с8-7
-ч8т8
8ч8т8-7
-ч8у8
8ч8у8-7
ч2у1
-ч8ф8
8ч8ф8-7
-ч8х8
8ч8х8-7
-ч8ц8
8ч8ц8-7
-2ч8ч8
8ч8ч8-7
-ч8ш8
8ч8ш8-7
-ч8щ8
8ч8щ8-7
-ч8ь8
8ч8ь8-7
ч6ь
-ч8ю8
8ч8ю8-7
ч2ю1
-ч8я8
8ч8я8-7
ч2я1
-ч8'8
-ч8’8
8ч8'8-7
ч6'
8ч8’8-7
ч6’
-ш8а8
8ш8а8-7
-2ш8б8
8ш8б8-7
-ш8в8
8ш8в8-7
-2ш8г8
8ш8г8-7
-ш8ґ8
8ш8ґ8-7
-ш8д8
8ш8д8-7
-ш8е8
8ш8е8-7
ш2е1
-ш8є8
8ш8є8-7
ш2є1
-ш8ж8
8ш8ж8-7
-ш8з8
8ш8з8-7
-ш8и8
8ш8и8-7
ш2и1
-ш8і8
8ш8і8-7
ш2і1
-ш8ї8
8ш8ї8-7
ш2ї1
-ш8й8
8ш8й8-7
-ш8к8
8ш8к8-7
-ш8л8
8ш8л8-7
-ш8м8
8ш8м8-7
-ш8н8
8ш8н8-7
-ш8о8
8ш8о8-7
ш2о1
-ш8п8
8ш8п8-7
-ш8р8
8ш8р8-7
-ш8с8
8ш8с8-7
-ш8т8
8ш8т8-7
-ш8у8
8ш8у8-7
ш2у1
-ш8ф8
8ш8ф8-7
-ш8х8
8ш8х8-7
-ш8ц8
8ш8ц8-7
-ш8ч8
8ш8ч8-7
-2ш8ш8
8ш8ш8-7
-ш8щ8
8ш8щ8-7
-ш8ь8
8ш8ь8-7
ш6ь
-ш8ю8
8ш8ю8-7
ш2ю1
-ш8я8
8ш8я8-7
ш2я1
-ш8'8
-ш8’8
8ш8'8-7
ш6'
8ш8’8-7
ш6’
-щ8а8
8щ8а8-7
щ2а1
-щ8б8
8щ8б8-7
-щ8в8
8щ8в8-7
-щ8г8
8щ8г8-7
-щ8ґ8
8щ8ґ8-7
-щ8д8
8щ8д8-7
-щ8е8
8щ8е8-7
щ2е1
-щ8є8
8щ8є8-7
щ2є1
-щ8ж8
8щ8ж8-7
-щ8з8
8щ8з8-7
-щ8и8
8щ8и8-7
щ2и1
-щ8і8
8щ8і8-7
щ2і1
-щ8ї8
8щ8ї8-7
щ2ї1
-щ8й8
8щ8й8-7
-щ8к8
8щ8к8-7
-щ8л8
8щ8л8-7
-щ8м8
8щ8м8-7
-щ8н8
8щ8н8-7
-щ8о8
8щ8о8-7
щ2о1
-щ8п8
8щ8п8-7
-щ8р8
8щ8р8-7
-щ8с8
8щ8с8-7
-щ8т8
8щ8т8-7
-щ8у8
8щ8у8-7
щ2у1
-щ8ф8
8щ8ф8-7
-щ8х8
8щ8х8-7
-щ8ц8
8щ8ц8-7
-щ8ч8
8щ8ч8-7
-щ8ш8
8щ8ш8-7
-2щ8щ8
8щ8щ8-7
-щ8ь8
8щ8ь8-7
щ6ь
-щ8ю8
8щ8ю8-7
щ2ю1
-щ8я8
8щ8я8-7
щ2я1
-щ8'8
-щ8’8
8щ8'8-7
щ6'
8щ8’8-7
щ6’
-ь8а8
-6ь
8ь8а8-7
ь2а1
-ь8б8
8ь8б8-7
-ь8в8
8ь8в8-7
-ь8г8
8ь8г8-7
-ь8ґ8
8ь8ґ8-7
-ь8д8
8ь8д8-7
-ь8е8
8ь8е8-7
ь2е1
-ь8є8
8ь8є8-7
ь2є1
-ь8ж8
8ь8ж8-7
-ь8з8
8ь8з8-7
-ь8и8
8ь8и8-7
ь2и1
-ь8і8
8ь8і8-7
ь2і1
-ь8ї8
8ь8ї8-7
ь2ї1
-ь8й8
8ь8й8-7
-ь8к8
8ь8к8-7
-ь8л8
8ь8л8-7
-ь8м8
8ь8м8-7
-ь8н8
8ь8н8-7
-ь8о8
8ь8о8-7
-ь8п8
8ь8п8-7
-ь8р8
8ь8р8-7
-ь8с8
8ь8с8-7
-ь8т8
8ь8т8-7
-ь8у8
8ь8у8-7
ь2у1
-ь8ф8
8ь8ф8-7
-ь8х8
8ь8х8-7
-ь8ц8
8ь8ц8-7
-ь8ч8
8ь8ч8-7
-ь8ш8
8ь8ш8-7
-ь8щ8
8ь8щ8-7
-6ь8ь8
8ь8ь8-7
ь6ь
-ь8ю8
8ь8ю8-7
ь2ю1
-ь8я8
8ь8я8-7
ь2я1
-ь8'8
-ь8’8
8ь8'8-7
ь6'
8ь8’8-7
ь6’
-ю8а8
-2ю1
8ю8а8-7
-ю8б8
8ю8б8-7
-ю8в8
8ю8в8-7
-ю8г8
8ю8г8-7
-ю8ґ8
8ю8ґ8-7
-ю8д8
8ю8д8-7
-ю8е8
8ю8е8-7
-ю8є8
8ю8є8-7
-ю8ж8
8ю8ж8-7
-ю8з8
8ю8з8-7
-ю8и8
8ю8и8-7
ю2и1
-ю8і8
8ю8і8-7
-ю8ї8
8ю8ї8-7
-ю8й8
8ю8й8-7
-ю8к8
8ю8к8-7
-ю8л8
8ю8л8-7
-ю8м8
8ю8м8-7
-ю8н8
8ю8н8-7
-ю8о8
8ю8о8-7
-ю8п8
8ю8п8-7
-ю8р8
8ю8р8-7
-ю8с8
8ю8с8-7
-ю8т8
8ю8т8-7
-ю8у8
8ю8у8-7
-ю8ф8
8ю8ф8-7
-ю8х8
8ю8х8-7
-ю8ц8
8ю8ц8-7
-ю8ч8
8ю8ч8-7
-ю8ш8
8ю8ш8-7
-ю8щ8
8ю8щ8-7
-ю8ь8
8ю8ь8-7
ю6ь
-2ю8ю8
8ю8ю8-7
-ю8я8
8ю8я8-7
-ю8'8
-ю8’8
8ю8'8-7
ю6'
8ю8’8-7
ю6’
-я8а8
-2я1
8я8а8-7
-я8б8
8я8б8-7
-я8в8
8я8в8-7
-я8г8
8я8г8-7
-я8ґ8
8я8ґ8-7
-я8д8
8я8д8-7
-я8е8
8я8е8-7
-я8є8
8я8є8-7
-я8ж8
8я8ж8-7
-я8з8
8я8з8-7
-я8и8
8я8и8-7
я2и1
-я8і8
8я8і8-7
-я8ї8
8я8ї8-7
-я8й8
8я8й8-7
-я8к8
8я8к8-7
-я8л8
8я8л8-7
-я8м8
8я8м8-7
-я8н8
8я8н8-7
-я8о8
8я8о8-7
-я8п8
8я8п8-7
-я8р8
8я8р8-7
-я8с8
8я8с8-7
-я8т8
8я8т8-7
-я8у8
8я8у8-7
-я8ф8
8я8ф8-7
-я8х8
8я8х8-7
-я8ц8
8я8ц8-7
-я8ч8
8я8ч8-7
-я8ш8
8я8ш8-7
-я8щ8
8я8щ8-7
-я8ь8
8я8ь8-7
я6ь
-я8ю8
8я8ю8-7
-2я8я8
8я8я8-7
-я8'8
-я8’8
8я8'8-7
я6'
8я8’8-7
я6’
-'8а8
-6'
-’8а8
-6’
8'8а8-7
'2а1
8’8а8-7
’2а1
-'8б8
-’8б8
8'8б8-7
8’8б8-7
-'8в8
-’8в8
8'8в8-7
8’8в8-7
-'8г8
-’8г8
8'8г8-7
8’8г8-7
-'8ґ8
-’8ґ8
8'8ґ8-7
8’8ґ8-7
-'8д8
-’8д8
8'8д8-7
8’8д8-7
-'8е8
-’8е8
8'8е8-7
'2е1
8’8е8-7
’2е1
-'8є8
-’8є8
8'8є8-7
'2є1
8’8є8-7
’2є1
-'8ж8
-’8ж8
8'8ж8-7
8’8ж8-7
-'8з8
-’8з8
8'8з8-7
8’8з8-7
-'8и8
-’8и8
8'8и8-7
'2и1
8’8и8-7
’2и1
-'8і8
-’8і8
8'8і8-7
'2і1
8’8і8-7
’2і1
-'8ї8
-’8ї8
8'8ї8-7
8’8ї8-7
-'8й8
-’8й8
8'8й8-7
8’8й8-7
-'8к8
-’8к8
8'8к8-7
8’8к8-7
-'8л8
-’8л8
8'8л8-7
8’8л8-7
-'8м8
-’8м8
8'8м8-7
8’8м8-7
-'8н8
-’8н8
8'8н8-7
8’8н8-7
-'8о8
-’8о8
8'8о8-7
'2о1
8’8о8-7
’2о1
-'8п8
-’8п8
8'8п8-7
8’8п8-7
-'8р8
-’8р8
8'8р8-7
8’8р8-7
-'8с8
-’8с8
8'8с8-7
8’8с8-7
-'8т8
-’8т8
8'8т8-7
8’8т8-7
-'8у8
-’8у8
8'8у8-7
'2у1
8’8у8-7
’2у1
-'8ф8
-’8ф8
8'8ф8-7
8’8ф8-7
-'8х8
-’8х8
8'8х8-7
8’8х8-7
-'8ц8
-’8ц8
8'8ц8-7
8’8ц8-7
-'8ч8
-’8ч8
8'8ч8-7
8’8ч8-7
-'8ш8
-’8ш8
8'8ш8-7
8’8ш8-7
-'8щ8
-’8щ8
8'8щ8-7
8’8щ8-7
-'8ь8
-’8ь8
8'8ь8-7
'6ь
8’8ь8-7
’6ь
-'8ю8
-’8ю8
8'8ю8-7
'2ю1
8’8ю8-7
’2ю1
-'8я8
-’8я8
8'8я8-7
'2я1
8’8я8-7
’2я1
-6'8'8
-6’8’8
8'8'8-7
'6'
8’8’8-7
’6’
